District of Columbia statutes.
34-220

“Telephone corporation” defined.

The term “telephone corporation” when used in this subtitle includes every corporation, company, association, joint-stock company or association, partnership, and persons, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, operating, controlling, or managing any plant, wires, poles for the reception, transmission, or communication of messages by telephone, telephonic apparatus or instruments, or any telephone line or part of telephone line, used in the conduct of the business of affording telephonic communication for hire, or which licenses, lets, or permits telephonic communication for hire.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1981 Ed., § 43-217.
1973 Ed., § 43-117.